North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160D. Local Planning and Development Regulation.
Article 11. Building Code Enforcement.
§ 160D-1121.
Action in event of failure to take corrective action.

If the owner of a building or structure that has been condemned as unsafe pursuant to

G.S. 160D-1119

fails to take prompt corrective action, the local inspector shall give written notice, by certified mail to the owner’s last known address or by personal service, of all of the following:

That the building or structure is in a condition that appears to meet one or more of the following conditions:

Constitutes a fire or safety hazard.

Is dangerous to life, health, or other property.

Is likely to cause or contribute to blight, disease, vagrancy, or danger to children.

Has a tendency to attract persons intent on criminal activities or other activities that would constitute a public nuisance.

That an administrative hearing will be held before the inspector at a designated place and time, not later than 10 days after the date of the notice, at which time the owner will be entitled to be heard in person or by counsel and to present arguments and evidence pertaining to the matter.

That following the hearing, the inspector may issue such order to repair, close, vacate, or demolish the building or structure as appears appropriate.

If the name or whereabouts of the owner cannot, after due diligence, be discovered, the notice shall be considered properly and adequately served if a copy is posted on the outside of the building or structure in question at least 10 days prior to the hearing and a notice of the hearing is published in a newspaper having general circulation in the local government’s area of jurisdiction at least once not later than one week prior to the hearing.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 33, 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1122.
Order to take corrective action.

If, upon a hearing held pursuant to the notice prescribed in

G.S. 160D-1119

, the inspector shall find that the building or structure is in a condition that constitutes a fire or safety hazard or renders it dangerous to life, health, or other property, the inspector shall make an order in writing, directed to the owner of such building or structure, requiring the owner to remedy the defective conditions by repairing, closing, vacating, or demolishing the building or structure or taking other necessary steps, within such period, not less than 60 days, as the inspector may prescribe, provided that where the inspector finds that there is imminent danger to life or other property, the inspector may order that corrective action be taken in such lesser period as may be feasible.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1123.
Appeal; finality of order if not appealed.

Any owner who has received an order under

G.S. 160D-1122

may appeal from the order to the governing board by giving notice of appeal in writing to the inspector and to the local government clerk within 10 days following issuance of the order. In the absence of an appeal, the order of the inspector is final. The governing board shall hear an appeal in accordance with

G.S. 160D-406

and render a decision within a reasonable time. The governing board may affirm, modify and affirm, or revoke the order.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 34, 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1124.
Failure to comply with order.

If the owner of a building or structure fails to comply with an order issued pursuant to

G.S. 160D-1122

from which no appeal has been taken or fails to comply with an order of the governing board following an appeal, the owner is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 35, 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1125.
Enforcement.

Action Authorized. — Whenever any violation is denominated a misdemeanor under the provisions of this Article, the local government, either in addition to or in lieu of other remedies, may initiate any appropriate action or proceedings to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate the violation or to prevent the occupancy of the building or structure involved.

Removal of Building. — In the case of a building or structure declared unsafe under

G.S. 160D-1119

or an ordinance adopted pursuant to

G.S. 160D-1119

, a local government may, in lieu of taking action under subsection (a) of this section, cause the building or structure to be removed or demolished. The amounts incurred by the local government in connection with the removal or demolition are a lien against the real property upon which the cost was incurred. The lien shall be filed, have the same priority, and be collected in the same manner as liens for special assessments provided in Article 10 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes. If the building or structure is removed or demolished by the local government, the local government shall sell the usable materials of the building and any personal property, fixtures, or appurtenances found in or attached to the building. The local government shall credit the proceeds of the sale against the cost of the removal or demolition. Any balance remaining from the sale shall be deposited with the clerk of superior court of the county where the property is located and shall be disbursed by the court to the person found to be entitled thereto by final order or decree of the court.

Additional Lien. — The amounts incurred by a local government in connection with the removal or demolition are also a lien against any other real property owned by the owner of the building or structure and located within the local government’s planning and development regulation jurisdiction, and for cities without extraterritorial planning and development jurisdiction, within one mile of the city limits, except for the owner’s primary residence. The provisions of subsection (b) of this section apply to this additional lien, except that this additional lien is inferior to all prior liens and shall be collected as a money judgment.

Nonexclusive Remedy. — Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or limit the power of the local government to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement by summary proceedings or otherwise.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 36, 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1126.
Records and reports.

The inspection department shall keep complete and accurate records in convenient form of all applications received, permits issued, inspections and reinspections made, defects found, certificates of compliance or occupancy granted, and all other work and activities of the department. These records shall be kept in the manner and for the periods prescribed by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. Periodic reports shall be submitted to the governing board and to the Commissioner of Insurance as they shall by ordinance, rule, or regulation require.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1127.
Appeals.

Unless otherwise provided by law, appeals from any order, decision, or determination by a member of a local inspection department pertaining to the State Building Code or other State building laws shall be taken to the Commissioner of Insurance or the Commissioner’s designee or other official specified in

G.S. 143-139

by filing a written notice with the Commissioner and with the inspection department within a period of 10 days after the order, decision, or determination. Further appeals may be taken to the State Building Code Council or to the courts as provided by law.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1128.
Fire limits.

County Fire Limits. — A county may by ordinance establish and define fire limits in any area within the county and not within a city. The limits may include only business and industrial areas. Within any fire limits, no frame or wooden building or addition thereto may be erected, altered, repaired, or moved, either into the fire limits or from one place to another within the limits, except upon the permit of the inspection department and approval of the Commissioner of Insurance. The governing board may make additional regulations necessary for the prevention, extinguishment, or mitigation of fires within the fire limits.

Municipal Fire Limits. — The governing board of every incorporated city shall pass one or more ordinances establishing and defining fire limits, which shall include the principal business portions of the city and which shall be known as primary fire limits. In addition, the governing board may, in its discretion, establish and define one or more separate areas within the city as secondary fire limits.

Restrictions Within Municipal Primary Fire Limits. — Within the primary fire limits of any city, as established and defined by ordinance, no frame or wooden building or structure or addition thereto shall hereafter be erected, altered, repaired, or moved, either into the limits or from one place to another within the limits, except upon the permit of the local inspection department approved by the governing board and by the Commissioner of Insurance or the Commissioner’s designee. The governing board may make additional regulations for the prevention, extinguishment, or mitigation of fires within the primary fire limits.

Restrictions Within Municipal Secondary Fire Limits. — Within any secondary fire limits of any city or town, as established and defined by ordinance, no frame or wooden building or structure or addition thereto shall be erected, altered, repaired, or moved, except in accordance with any rules and regulations established by ordinance of the areas.

Failure to Establish Municipal Primary Fire Limits. — If the governing board of any city shall fail or refuse to establish and define the primary fire limits of the city as required by law, after having such failure or refusal called to their attention in writing by the State Commissioner of Insurance, the Commissioner shall have the power to establish the limits upon making a determination that they are necessary and in the public interest.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1129.
Regulation authorized as to repair, closing, and demolition of nonresidential buildings or structures; order of public officer.

Authority. — The governing board of the local government may adopt and enforce regulations relating to nonresidential buildings or structures that fail to meet minimum standards of maintenance, sanitation, and safety established by the governing board. The minimum standards shall address only conditions that are dangerous and injurious to public health, safety, and welfare and identify circumstances under which a public necessity exists for the repair, closing, or demolition of such buildings or structures. The regulations shall provide for designation or appointment of a public officer to exercise the powers prescribed by the regulation, in accordance with the procedures specified in this section. Regulations adopted under this section shall be applicable within the local government’s entire planning and development regulation jurisdiction or limited to one or more designated zoning districts, municipal service districts, or defined geographical areas designated for improvement and investment in an adopted comprehensive plan.

Investigation. — Whenever it appears to the public officer that any nonresidential building or structure has not been properly maintained so that the safety or health of its occupants or members of the general public are jeopardized for failure of the property to meet the minimum standards established by the governing board, the public officer shall undertake a preliminary investigation. If entry upon the premises for purposes of investigation is necessary, such entry shall be made pursuant to a duly issued administrative search warrant in accordance with

G.S. 15-27.2

or with permission of the owner, the owner’s agent, a tenant, or other person legally in possession of the premises.

Complaint and Hearing. — If the preliminary investigation discloses evidence of a violation of the minimum standards, the public officer shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner of and parties in interest in the nonresidential building or structure a complaint. The complaint shall state the charges and contain a notice that an administrative hearing will be held before the public officer, or his or her designated agent, at a place within the county scheduled not less than 10 days nor more than 30 days after the serving of the complaint; that the owner and parties in interest shall be given the right to answer the complaint and to appear in person, or otherwise, and give testimony at the place and time fixed in the complaint; and that the rules of evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity are not controlling in hearings before the public officer.

Order. — If, after notice and hearing, the public officer determines that the nonresidential building or structure has not been properly maintained so that the safety or health of its occupants or members of the general public is jeopardized for failure of the property to meet the minimum standards established by the governing board, the public officer shall state in writing findings of fact in support of that determination and shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner thereof an order. The order may require the owner to take remedial action, within a reasonable time specified, subject to the procedures and limitations herein.

Limitations on Orders. —

An order may require the owner to repair, alter, or improve the nonresidential building or structure in order to bring it into compliance with the minimum standards established by the governing board or to vacate and close the nonresidential building or structure for any use.

An order may require the owner to remove or demolish the nonresidential building or structure if the cost of repair, alteration, or improvement of the building or structure would exceed fifty percent (50%) of its then current value. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the nonresidential building or structure is designated as a local historic landmark, listed in the National Register of Historic Places, or located in a locally designated historic district or in a historic district listed in the National Register of Historic Places and the governing board determines, after an administrative hearing as provided by ordinance, that the nonresidential building or structure is of individual significance or contributes to maintaining the character of the district, and the nonresidential building or structure has not been condemned as unsafe, the order may require that the nonresidential building or structure be vacated and closed until it is brought into compliance with the minimum standards established by the governing board.

An order may not require repairs, alterations, or improvements to be made to vacant manufacturing facilities or vacant industrial warehouse facilities to preserve the original use. The order may require such building or structure to be vacated and closed, but repairs may be required only when necessary to maintain structural integrity or to abate a health or safety hazard that cannot be remedied by ordering the building or structure closed for any use.

Action by Governing Board Upon Failure to Comply With Order. —

If the owner fails to comply with an order to repair, alter, or improve or to vacate and close the nonresidential building or structure, the governing board may adopt an ordinance ordering the public officer to proceed to effectuate the purpose of this section with respect to the particular property or properties that the public officer found to be jeopardizing the health or safety of its occupants or members of the general public. The property or properties shall be described in the ordinance. The ordinance shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds and shall be indexed in the name of the property owner or owners in the grantor index. Following adoption of an ordinance, the public officer may cause the building or structure to be repaired, altered, or improved or to be vacated and closed. The public officer may cause to be posted on the main entrance of any nonresidential building or structure so closed a placard with the following words: “This building is unfit for any use; the use or occupation of this building for any purpose is prohibited and unlawful.” Any person who occupies or knowingly allows the occupancy of a building or structure so posted is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

If the owner fails to comply with an order to remove or demolish the nonresidential building or structure, the governing board may adopt an ordinance ordering the public officer to proceed to effectuate the purpose of this section with respect to the particular property or properties that the public officer found to be jeopardizing the health or safety of its occupants or members of the general public. No ordinance shall be adopted to require demolition of a nonresidential building or structure until the owner has first been given a reasonable opportunity to bring it into conformity with the minimum standards established by the governing board. The property or properties shall be described in the ordinance. The ordinance shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds and shall be indexed in the name of the property owner or owners in the grantor index. Following adoption of an ordinance, the public officer may cause the building or structure to be removed or demolished.

Action by Governing Board Upon Abandonment of Intent to Repair. — If the governing board has adopted an ordinance or the public officer has issued an order requiring the building or structure to be repaired or vacated and closed and the building or structure has been vacated and closed for a period of two years pursuant to the ordinance or order, the governing board may make findings that the owner has abandoned the intent and purpose to repair, alter, or improve the building or structure and that the continuation of the building or structure in its vacated and closed status would be inimical to the health, safety, and welfare of the local government in that it would continue to deteriorate, would create a fire or safety hazard, would be a threat to children and vagrants, would attract persons intent on criminal activities, or would cause or contribute to blight and the deterioration of property values in the area. Upon such findings, the governing board may, after the expiration of the two-year period, enact an ordinance and serve such ordinance on the owner, setting forth the following:

If the cost to repair the nonresidential building or structure to bring it into compliance with the minimum standards is less than or equal to fifty percent (50%) of its then current value, the ordinance shall require that the owner either repair or demolish and remove the building or structure within 90 days.

If the cost to repair the nonresidential building or structure to bring it into compliance with the minimum standards exceeds fifty percent (50%) of its then current value, the ordinance shall require the owner to demolish and remove the building or structure within 90 days.In the case of vacant manufacturing facilities or vacant industrial warehouse facilities, the building or structure must have been vacated and closed pursuant to an order or ordinance for a period of five years before the governing board may take action under this subsection. The ordinance shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds in the county wherein the property or properties are located and shall be indexed in the name of the property owner in the grantor index. If the owner fails to comply with the ordinance, the public officer shall effectuate the purpose of the ordinance.

Service of Complaints and Orders. — Complaints or orders issued by a public officer pursuant to an ordinance adopted under this section shall be served upon persons either personally or by certified mail so long as the means used are reasonably designed to achieve actual notice. When service is made by certified mail, a copy of the complaint or order may also be sent by regular mail. Service shall be deemed sufficient if the certified mail is refused but the regular mail is not returned by the post office within 10 days after the mailing. If regular mail is used, a notice of the pending proceedings shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the premises affected. If the identities of any owners or the whereabouts of persons are unknown and cannot be ascertained by the public officer in the exercise of reasonable diligence and the public officer makes an affidavit to that effect, the serving of the complaint or order upon the owners or other persons may be made by publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the local government at least once no later than the time that personal service would be required under this section. When service is made by publication, a notice of the pending proceedings shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the premises affected.

Liens. —

The amount of the cost of repairs, alterations, or improvements, or vacating and closing, or removal or demolition by the public officer are a lien against the real property upon which the cost was incurred, which lien shall be filed, have the same priority, and be collected as the lien for special assessment provided in Article 10 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.

If the real property upon which the cost was incurred is located in an incorporated city, the amount of the costs is also a lien on any other real property of the owner located within the city limits except for the owner’s primary residence. The additional lien provided in this subdivision is inferior to all prior liens and shall be collected as a money judgment.

If the nonresidential building or structure is removed or demolished by the public officer, he or she shall offer for sale the recoverable materials of the building or structure and any personal property, fixtures, or appurtenances found in or attached to the building or structure and shall credit the proceeds of the sale, if any, against the cost of the removal or demolition, and any balance remaining shall be deposited in the superior court by the public officer, shall be secured in a manner directed by the court, and shall be disbursed by the court to the persons found to be entitled thereto by final order or decree of the court. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or limit in any way the power of the governing board to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement by summary proceedings or otherwise.

Ejectment. — If any occupant fails to comply with an order to vacate a nonresidential building or structure, the public officer may file a civil action in the name of the local government to remove the occupant. The action to vacate is in the nature of summary ejectment and shall be commenced by filing a complaint naming as parties-defendant any person occupying the nonresidential building or structure. The clerk of superior court shall issue a summons requiring the defendant to appear before a magistrate at a certain time, date, and place not to exceed 10 days from the issuance of the summons to answer the complaint. The summons and complaint shall be served as provided in

G.S. 42-29

. The summons shall be returned according to its tenor, and if on its return it appears to have been duly served and if at the hearing the public officer produces a certified copy of an ordinance adopted by the governing board pursuant to subsection (f) of this section to vacate the occupied nonresidential building or structure, the magistrate shall enter judgment ordering that the premises be vacated and all persons be removed. The judgment ordering that the nonresidential building or structure be vacated shall be enforced in the same manner as the judgment for summary ejectment entered under

G.S. 42-30

. An appeal from any judgment entered under this subsection by the magistrate may be taken as provided in

G.S. 7A-228

, and the execution of the judgment may be stayed as provided in

G.S. 7A-227

. An action to remove an occupant of a nonresidential building or structure who is a tenant of the owner may not be in the nature of a summary ejectment proceeding pursuant to this subsection unless the occupant was served with notice, at least 30 days before the filing of the summary ejectment proceeding, that the governing board has ordered the public officer to proceed to exercise his or her duties under subsection (f) of this section to vacate and close or remove and demolish the nonresidential building or structure.

Civil Penalty. — The governing board may impose civil penalties against any person or entity that fails to comply with an order entered pursuant to this section. However, the imposition of civil penalties does not limit the use of any other lawful remedies available to the governing board for the enforcement of any ordinances adopted pursuant to this section.

Supplemental Powers. — The powers conferred by this section are supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law. An ordinance adopted by the governing board may authorize the public officer to exercise any powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purpose and provisions of this section, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:

To investigate nonresidential buildings and structures in the local government’s planning and development regulation jurisdiction to determine whether they have been properly maintained in compliance with the minimum standards so that the safety or health of the occupants or members of the general public are not jeopardized.

To administer oaths, affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence.

To enter upon premises pursuant to subsection (b) of this section for the purpose of making examinations in a manner that will do the least possible inconvenience to the persons in possession.

To appoint and fix the duties of officers, agents, and employees necessary to carry out the purposes of the ordinances adopted by the governing board.

To delegate any of his or her functions and powers under the ordinance to other officers and agents.

Appeals. — The governing board may provide that appeals may be taken from any decision or order of the public officer to the local government’s housing appeals board or board of adjustment. Any person aggrieved by a decision or order of the public officer has the remedies provided in

G.S. 160D-1208

.

Funding. — The governing board is authorized to make appropriations from its revenues necessary to carry out the purposes of this section and may accept and apply grants or donations to assist in carrying out the provisions of the ordinances adopted by the governing board.

No Effect on Just Compensation for Taking by Eminent Domain. — Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the owner or owners of any property from receiving just compensation for the taking of property by the power of eminent domain under the laws of this State nor as permitting any property to be condemned or destroyed except in accordance with the police power of the State.

Definitions. — As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

Parties in interest. — All individuals, associations, and corporations who have interests of record in a nonresidential building or structure and any who are in possession thereof.

Vacant industrial warehouse. — Any building or structure designed for the storage of goods or equipment in connection with manufacturing processes, which has not been used for that purpose for at least one year and has not been converted to another use.

Vacant manufacturing facility. — Any building or structure previously used for the lawful production or manufacturing of goods, which has not been used for that purpose for at least one year and has not been converted to another use.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 37, 51(a), (b), (d).